Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-233.01
Migratory waterfowl, defined.

Migratory waterfowl means any ducks, geese, or brant upon which an open season has been established by the commission.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 8.